Tennessee, session 114, HB0516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-136(f), is amended by deleting
the language "report to the members of the general assembly" and substituting "report to the
members of the general assembly and the legislative librarian".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0516
001834
- 1 -